Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that RCW 28A.655.070 requires the superintendent of public instruction to provide school districts with a collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to evaluate the academic status of individual students. Further, these tools must be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily shared with parents and students.(2) The legislature also acknowledges that RCW 28A.655.200 directs the office of the superintendent of public instruction to offer training at statewide and regional staff development activities in the interpretation of diagnostic assessments and the application of instructional strategies that will increase student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.(3) The legislature intends to continue to support the use of assessment, diagnostic, and learning tools by establishing a temporary grant program to provide funding to help school districts and public schools purchase or maintain access to these tools.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program to support the use of assessment, diagnostic, and learning tools for students in grades kindergarten through 12 in math and English language arts.(2) The purpose of the grant program is to provide funding to help support public schools and school districts purchase or maintain access to a digital platform with assessment, diagnostic, and learning tools that will identify students' individual needs and help monitor student progress and growth.(3)(a) School districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools may apply for these grants. Applicants must describe their plan for the use of this funding and how they will provide professional development so staff can effectively use these tools. The assessment tools must have a criterion-referenced component.(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must award grants based on need and ensure that grant recipients vary by geographic location and size.(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the grant program established under this section.(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report on the outcomes of the grant program established by this section by November 1st of each year that grants are awarded. Reports must include information on how the grant funding was used, student demographics, and the impact on math and English language arts test scores.(6) This section expires December 31, 2028.--- END ---